Arkansas, session 2025, SB254.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 14-270-102(7), concerning the definition of
"property in kind" in relation to rural community projects, is amended to
read as follows:
(7) “Property in kind” means real or personal property "In-kind
donations" means committed goods and services, including without limitation:
(A) Real or personal property;
(B) Labor;
(C) Equipment;
(D) Materials;
(E) Services; and
(F) Money.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 14-270-103(a)(2)(A), concerning when the
grant of state funds is authorized for rural community projects, is amended
to read as follows:
*SSS179*
02/18/2025 11:11:56 AM SSS179

SB254
(2)(A) The members of the community or small city or town
presenting the request to the quorum court or the governing body shall have
submitted proof that, through donations of either money or property in kind
in-kind donations, the citizens of the community, city, or town, have pledged
or will make available one-fourth (¼) of the cost of the project and that no
tax funds are included in the citizens' support.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 14-270-103(a)(3), concerning when the grant
of state funds is authorized for rural community projects, is amended to read
as follows:
(3) The quorum court of the county or governing body of the city
or town approves and, if the citizens of the community, city, or town do not
provide the county's or the city's or town's share, appropriates the funds or
provides property in kind in-kind donations to defray one-fourth (¼) of the
cost of the project; and





















02/18/2025 11:11:56 AM SSS179